Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 94.
THE ARKANSAS ELECTED OFFICIALS ETHICS, TRANSPARENCY, AND FINANCIAL REFORM AMENDMENT OF 2014 (CONST., ART. 19, §§ 28-31, ADDED; CONST., ART. 5, §§ 29, 30, CONST., ART. 16, §§ 4, 12, CONST. AMEND. 70, § 1, CONST. AMEND. 73, § 2, CONST. AMEND. 80, § 16(E), AMENDED; CONST., ART. 5, § 16, CONST., ART. 19, § 11, CONST. AMEND. 6, § 6, CONST. AMEND. 9, § 2, CONST. AMENDS. 15, 43, CONST. AMEND. 70, § 3, REPEALED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment added Ark. Const., Art. 19, §§ 28, 29, 30, and 31; amended Art. 5, §§ 29, 30, Art. 16, §§ 4, 12, Amend. 70, § 1, Amend. 73, § 2, and Amend. 80, § 16(E); and repealed Art. 5, § 16, Art. 19, § 11, Amend. 6, § 6, Amend. 9, § 2, Amend. 15, Amend. 43, and Amend. 70, § 3. The amendments are incorporated within those sections. Amendment 94 was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Amend. 94, § 1, provided: “This amendment shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Arkansas Elected Officials Ethics, Transparency, and Financial Reform Amendment of 2014’.”

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, § 18: Nov. 5, 2014.